Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.020

Rules—Administration and interpretation of title.

(1) The director has the power to adopt rules, as he or she determines necessary and appropriate, to implement the purposes and provisions of this title in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) The director has the power, and broad administrative discretion, to administer and interpret the provisions of this title to facilitate the delivery of trust business and fiduciary services to the citizens of the state of Washington by trust businesses and other persons.

[ 2014 c 37 s 304.]